Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-3951.03
Board members; vacancies.

(1) A vacancy on the board exists in the event of the death, incapacity,
removal, or resignation of any member; when a member ceases to be a resident
of Nebraska; when a member ceases to be a producer in Nebraska; or when the
member's term expires. Members whose terms have expired shall continue to
serve until their successors are appointed and qualified, except that if such
a vacancy will not be filled, as determined by the Governor under section 2-3951.02, the member shall not serve after
the expiration of his or her term.

(2) For purposes of filling vacancies on the board, the Governor shall
appoint one member from up to two nominees submitted by the vacating
member's nominator under section 2-3951.02. In the event of a
vacancy, the board shall certify to the vacating member's nominator that
such a vacancy exists and shall request nominations to fill the vacancy for
the remainder of the unexpired term or for a new term, as the case may be.

Laws 2004, LB 836, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB70, § 4.